node_0
the mouse striatum : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
the mouse striatum : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
the mouse striatum : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
the mouse striatum : From a technical point of view the mouse striatum has several advantages that make it an excellent target for complex trait analysis of the mammalian CNS.
it : From a technical point of view the mouse striatum has several advantages that make it an excellent target for complex trait analysis of the mammalian CNS.
it : First, it is a large, cytoarchitectonically distinct region comprising approximately 5-6% of the volume of the mouse brain.
mouse striatum : The first is a biometric analysis of variation of size and neuronal populations in mouse striatum.
the mouse striatum : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
the striatum : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
the striatum : A series of six contiguous counting boxes (each 40 x 65 x 20 μm) aligned in a 3 x 2 matrix were placed randomly within the striatum, and those neurons the nucleoli of which were in focus were counted as described previously [61, 62].
the striatum : Multiplying the volume of the striatum by its cell-packing density permitted estimation of the number of neurons in that nucleus.
its : Multiplying the volume of the striatum by its cell-packing density permitted estimation of the number of neurons in that nucleus.
node_2
mouse : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
mouse : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
mice : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
mouse : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
mice : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
mouse : From a technical point of view the mouse striatum has several advantages that make it an excellent target for complex trait analysis of the mammalian CNS.
mouse : First, it is a large, cytoarchitectonically distinct region comprising approximately 5-6% of the volume of the mouse brain.
mouse : The first is a biometric analysis of variation of size and neuronal populations in mouse striatum.
mouse : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
mice : Figure 1  Histograms of histologic phenotypes for inbred strains of mice.
mice : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
mice : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
mice : The volume of the granule cell layer of the dentate gyrus varies as much as 40-80% among different inbred strains of mice [33-35].
mice : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
mouse : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
mouse : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
mouse : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
the mouse : In the mouse, members of this receptor type act to indirectly down-regulate synaptic activity in the striatum [45].
mice : For this reason, brain weight has been suggested to be a good surrogate measure for total cell number in mice, as in humans [53].
mice : The BXD5 strain used as the paternal strain in this intercross is a recombinant inbred strain that was derived by crossing C57BL/6J and DBA/2J lines of mice [58].
mice : All stocks of mice were obtained from the Jackson Laboratory .
node_4
volume : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
volume : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
striatal volume : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
striatal volume : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Striatal volume : Striatal volume ranged from 20 to 37 mm3.
volume : In contrast, there was a strong positive correlation between volume and neuron number among intercross progeny.
striatal volume : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
the size of the striatum :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
size : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
Striatal Volume : Phenotypes  Strain differences  Brain Weight and Striatal Volume.
striatal volume : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
Striatal volume : B. Striatal volume.
striatal volume : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
volume : As a result of the reciprocal relation between volume and density, there is no significant difference in striatal neuron number among the five strains.
striatal volume : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
Striatal volume : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
the striatal volume : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
striatal volume : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
striatal volume : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
striatal volume : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
striatal volume : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
Striatal volume : Striatal volume negatively correlates with neuron-packing density in these subjects.
striatal volume : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
Striatal Volume : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
striatal volume :  The strongest linkage was found between variation in striatal volume and an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM.
striatal volume : This locus accounts for as much as a third of the total phenotypic variance in striatal volume and as much as 50% of the genotypic variance (h2 = 0.39).
striatal volume : We estimate a single B allele inherited from the BXD5 parent increases striatal volume by approximately 2.0-2.5 mm3.
striatal volume : Linkage on Chr 19 is not affected at all by remapping with control for the striatal volume locus on Chr 10.
striatal volume : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
Striatal volume : Striatal volume correlates strongly to brain weight.
striatal volume : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
the volume of the striatum : We have succeeded in mapping one QTL with somewhat more intense effects on the volume of the striatum than the rest of the brain to the proximal half of chromosome 10.
volume : We did find large strain differences in volume.
volume : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
striatal volume : There was in fact a strong inverse relationship between striatal volume and neuron-packing density that led to a remarkably stabile neuron number.
volume : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
striatal volume : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
striatal volume : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
striatal volume : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
this nucleus : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
volume : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
striatal volumes : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
striatal volume : Subsequent measurements of striatal volume and neuron packing density were corrected for volumetric shrinkage.
Striatal Volume : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
Volume of the striatum : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
Volume : Volume was computed separately for the right and left sides and corrected for shrinkage.
the volume of the striatum : Multiplying the volume of the striatum by its cell-packing density permitted estimation of the number of neurons in that nucleus.
striatal volume : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
volume : The observer not only re-measured the striatal volume from the same series of sections as the original measure, but also estimated volume from a second series of 1 in 10 sections offset by 5 sections from the previous series.
this dependent variable : The correlations among the three estimations ranged from .95 to .99 (P < .05), indicating a high degree of reliability for this dependent variable.
node_6
volume and neuron number : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
volume and neuron number : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
striatal volume and neuron number in mice : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
volume and neuron number : In contrast, there was a strong positive correlation between volume and neuron number among intercross progeny.
striatal volume and : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
two traits : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
these traits : Residuals for these traits were computed for both traits to minimize the influence of brain weight.
both traits : Residuals for these traits were computed for both traits to minimize the influence of brain weight.
Striatal Volume and Neuron Number : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
the two traits : Figure 4  Plots of LOD scores and LRS for each of the two traits.
both striatal volume and neuron number : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
striatal volume and neuron number : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
they : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
node_8
neuron : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
neuron : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
neuron : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
striatal neuron : Neuron-packing density ranged from approximately 50,000 to 100,000 neurons/mm3, and the striatal neuron population ranged from 1.4 to 2.5 million.
neuron : Inbred animals with larger brains had larger striata but lower neuron-packing density resulting in a narrow range of average neuron populations.
neuron : In contrast, there was a strong positive correlation between volume and neuron number among intercross progeny.
all neurons in the striatum : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
Striatal neurons : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
striatal neurons : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
striatal neurons : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
striatal neuron : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
neuron : Finally, recent experiments on the molecular control of telencephalic development have highlighted a number of genes that influence neuron proliferation and differentiation of the striatum and other neighboring forebrain structures [18][26-30].
neurons :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
Neuron : D. Neuron number in the striatum.
striatal neurons : There is a significant difference among strains in the packing density of striatal neurons (P < .001 for all comparisons).
Striatal Neuron :  Striatal Neuron Number.
striatal neuron : As a result of the reciprocal relation between volume and density, there is no significant difference in striatal neuron number among the five strains.
striatal neuron : Total striatal neuron numbers ranges over a very modest range - from a low of 1.72 ± .015 million in C57BL/6J to a high of 1.93 ± .035 million in BXD5.
striatal neurons : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
striatal neuron : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
striatal neuron : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
neuron : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
striatal neuron : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
Neuron : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
striatal neuron : Plot for striatal neuron number on Chr. 19.
striatal neuron : We identified a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number.
neuron : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
neurons : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
striatal neurons : Corresponding absolute numbers of striatal neurons for the three genotypes are 1.8, 1.9, and 2.2 million.
striatal neuron : Allelic differences in this interval account for up to 30% of the total variance in striatal neuron number.
neuron : Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts (LRS of 15.0 vs. 11.9).
neuron : Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts (LRS of 15.0 vs. 11.9).
neuron : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
neuron : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
neurons : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
neuron : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
neuron : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
neuron : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
neuron : There was in fact a strong inverse relationship between striatal volume and neuron-packing density that led to a remarkably stabile neuron number.
neuron : The striatum may be a special case - a region in which numbers of medium spiny neurons is more tightly regulated than neuron populations in some other regions.
striatal neurons :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
striatal neurons : We have also discovered linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons.
neuron : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
striatal neuron : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
neuron : Brain volume and neuron number  
neuron : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
neuron : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
neuron : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
neurons : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
neuron : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
neuron : Taken together with previous reports [51-53], we speculate that while total neuron number in the cerebrum may relate to total brain weight, the relationship of these two variables is flexible at the regional level.
striatal neuron : One of the ten C57BL/6J subjects was removed from the analysis because values for striatal neuron number were anomalous with Z scores more than 2.5.  
Neuron : Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number  Neurons were counted using the 3-dimensional counting software of Williams and Rakic [24].
neurons : Multiplying the volume of the striatum by its cell-packing density permitted estimation of the number of neurons in that nucleus.
neuron :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
neuron : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
node_10
neuron number : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
neuron number : Complex trait analysis of the mouse striatum: independent QTLs modulate volume and neuron number  
neuron number : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
number : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
the striatal neuron population : Neuron-packing density ranged from approximately 50,000 to 100,000 neurons/mm3, and the striatal neuron population ranged from 1.4 to 2.5 million.
neuron number : In contrast, there was a strong positive correlation between volume and neuron number among intercross progeny.
striatal neuron number : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
the number of neurons contained within it :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
neuronal populations in mouse striatum : The first is a biometric analysis of variation of size and neuronal populations in mouse striatum.
neuronal population of the mouse striatum : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
Neuron number in the striatum : D. Neuron number in the striatum.
striatal neuronal number : There are no significant difference in striatal neuronal number among the five inbred strains (F4,28 = 2.0. ns).  Striatal Neuron-Packing Density.
Striatal Neuron Number :  Striatal Neuron Number.
striatal neuron number : As a result of the reciprocal relation between volume and density, there is no significant difference in striatal neuron number among the five strains.
striatal neuron number : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
striatal neuron number : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
neuron number : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
striatal neuron number : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
Neuron Number : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
striatal neuron number : We identified a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number.
neuron number : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
numbers of neurons in striatum : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
the population : Each B allele increases the population by approximately 200,000 cells.
striatal neuron number : Allelic differences in this interval account for up to 30% of the total variance in striatal neuron number.
neuron number : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
neuron number : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
number of neurons in the striatum : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
neuron number : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
neuron number : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
neuron number : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
neuron number : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
striatal neuron number : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
neuron number : Brain volume and neuron number  
neuron number : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
neuron number : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
neuron number : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
striatal neuron number : One of the ten C57BL/6J subjects was removed from the analysis because values for striatal neuron number were anomalous with Z scores more than 2.5.  
Neuron Number : Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number  Neurons were counted using the 3-dimensional counting software of Williams and Rakic [24].
neuronal numbers :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
neuron number : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
node_12
Background : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
Background : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
Background : Background  
node_14
The striatum : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
The striatum : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
the striatum : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
the striatum : Finally, recent experiments on the molecular control of telencephalic development have highlighted a number of genes that influence neuron proliferation and differentiation of the striatum and other neighboring forebrain structures [18][26-30].
the striatum :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
it :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
the striatum : C. Neuron-packing density in the striatum.
the striatum : D. Neuron number in the striatum.
the striatum : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
the striatum : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
striatum : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
the striatum : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
the striatum : We have succeeded in mapping one QTL with somewhat more intense effects on the volume of the striatum than the rest of the brain to the proximal half of chromosome 10.
the striatum : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
the striatum : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
the striatum : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
The striatum : The striatum may be a special case - a region in which numbers of medium spiny neurons is more tightly regulated than neuron populations in some other regions.
the striatum : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
striatum : Generating lists of candidates for QTLs will soon be greatly facilitated by more complete and better annotated mouse and human sequence databases combined with information on gene expression profiles of whole brain and striatum [42].
the striatum : Vax1 is localized during development to the anterior ventral forebrain, and is expressed in the striatum during embryogenesis [28].
the striatum : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
the striatum : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
node_16
motor activity : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
motor activity : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
motor activity : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
node_18
motor activity and higher cognitive function : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
motor activity and higher cognitive function : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
motor activity and higher cognitive function : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
node_20
higher cognitive function : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
higher cognitive function : Abstract  Background  The striatum plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
higher cognitive function : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
node_22
We : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
We : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
We : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
We : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
we : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
we : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
Our : Our analysis of the neurogenetic control of striatal cell populations relies on the combination of two complementary quantitative approaches.
We :  We report here both neuroanatomic and genetic quantitative evidence that the size of the striatum and the number of neurons contained within it are modulated independently.
Our : Our comparisons are based on five strains, and one consequence of this modest sample size is that sampling errors and intraclass correlations may bias the results [31].
We : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
We : We first determined that the distribution of all four dependent measures were normally distributed (Fig 2), before subjecting the data to correlational analysis.
We : We estimate a single B allele inherited from the BXD5 parent increases striatal volume by approximately 2.0-2.5 mm3.
we : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
we : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
We : We identified a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number.
our : The LRS peaks at 15.0 (a LOD of 3.26) at one of our more distal markers (D19Mit123, 51 cM, p = .00055).
we : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
we : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
we : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
We : We have succeeded in mapping one QTL with somewhat more intense effects on the volume of the striatum than the rest of the brain to the proximal half of chromosome 10.
We : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
we :  Based on these findings, we anticipated significant differences in the striatum of inbred strains.
We : We did find large strain differences in volume.
our : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
we : It could also be that measuring specific neuronal subtypes would demonstrate a greater amount of variance than we currently report [32].
we : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
our : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
we : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
We :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
we : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
We : We have also discovered linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons.
our : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
our : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
we : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
we : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
our : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
we : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
our : This conclusion is bolstered at the genetic level by our report of two distinct QTLs for these two morphologic phenotypes.
we : Taken together with previous reports [51-53], we speculate that while total neuron number in the cerebrum may relate to total brain weight, the relationship of these two variables is flexible at the regional level.
we : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
we : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
we : A total of 518 of these ABDF2 progeny were generated, but for this study we selected a subset of 44 cases, of which 36 were fully genotyped (see below).
We : We therefore measured subjects representing the full range of brain weights (see Fig 2A).
We : We studied approximately equal numbers of males and females.
we : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
We : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
We :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
our :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
we : With a modest sample size such as we have been able to examine using unbiased stereological methods, even a QTL responsible for 30 to 50% of the variance.
our : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
we : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
We : We have mapped data with and without compensation for variance in brain weight.
The authors : The authors wish to thank Dr. Jing Gu, Aaron Levine, Anna Ohlis, and Stefany Palmieri for technical assistance.
We : We thank Richelle Strom for generating the F2 intercross mice.
node_24
variation in striatal volume : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
variation in striatal volume : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
volumetric variation in the mouse striatum : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
variation of size : The first is a biometric analysis of variation of size and neuronal populations in mouse striatum.
variation in the size : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
variation in striatal volume :  The strongest linkage was found between variation in striatal volume and an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM.
node_25
variation in : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
variation in : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
numerical : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
variation of : The first is a biometric analysis of variation of size and neuronal populations in mouse striatum.
variation in the : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
the total variance in striatal neuron number : Allelic differences in this interval account for up to 30% of the total variance in striatal neuron number.
variation in the total number of striatal neurons : We have also discovered linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons.
node_33
a complex trait analysis : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
a complex trait analysis : We analyzed variation in striatal volume and neuron number in mice and initiated a complex trait analysis to discover polymorphic genes that modulate the structure of the basal ganglia.
complex trait analysis : The first of these, complex trait analysis, is a comparatively new genetic method that makes it possible to map individual loci that underlie polygenic traits [22,23].
node_35
Results : Results  
Results : Results  
Results : Results  The results are divided in two sections.
The results : Results  The results are divided in two sections.
node_37
Brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
brain : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
Brain : Phenotypes  Strain differences  Brain Weight and Striatal Volume.
brain : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
Brain : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
brain : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
brain : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
brain : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
Brain : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
brains : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
brain : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
brain : Residuals for these traits were computed for both traits to minimize the influence of brain weight.
brain : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
the whole brain : This last parameter was estimated by subtracting the estimated bilateral striatal weight (assuming a specific gravity of 1.0) from that of the whole brain.
brain : Previously described QTL for brain weight [56].
brain : The Chr 10 interval has an appreciable effect on brain size.
brain : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
brain : Each B allele adds 20-30 mg to total brain weight.
brain : The specific striatal component of the Bsc10a was analyzed by mapping the residual striatal values that corrects for differences in brain volume.
brain : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
brain : Striatal volume correlates strongly to brain weight.
brain : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
brain : This non-predictable variation is of particular interest to us because it is generated in large part by genes that have more intense or even selective effects on the dorsal striatum than other brain regions.
the brain : We have succeeded in mapping one QTL with somewhat more intense effects on the volume of the striatum than the rest of the brain to the proximal half of chromosome 10.
the brain :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
whole brain : Generating lists of candidates for QTLs will soon be greatly facilitated by more complete and better annotated mouse and human sequence databases combined with information on gene expression profiles of whole brain and striatum [42].
brain : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
brain : The MARCKS-related protein gene is expressed in the striatum during early brain development in the rat [48].  
Brain : Brain volume and neuron number  
brain : It has previously been shown that differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number [51, 52].
brain : For this reason, brain weight has been suggested to be a good surrogate measure for total cell number in mice, as in humans [53].
brain : Taken together with previous reports [51-53], we speculate that while total neuron number in the cerebrum may relate to total brain weight, the relationship of these two variables is flexible at the regional level.
brain : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
brain : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
brain : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
brain : The sample included 20 animals in the lowest and highest quartiles, and 24 cases within 0.5 SD of the mean brain weight.
brain : We therefore measured subjects representing the full range of brain weights (see Fig 2A).
brain : The ABDF2 intercross has been used previously to map QTLs that modulate total brain weight [56] and cerebellar volume [57].
Brain : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
brain : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
Brain : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
brain : The unadjusted striatal estimates vary to a large extent as a result of variation in total brain weight.
brain : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
brain : We have mapped data with and without compensation for variance in brain weight.
node_39
Brain weight : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Brain weight : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Brain Weight : Phenotypes  Strain differences  Brain Weight and Striatal Volume.
brain weight : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
Brain weight :  A. Brain weight differences are apparent between the three categories (F4,28 = 82.1, P < .001).
brain weight : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
brain weight : Residuals for these traits were computed for both traits to minimize the influence of brain weight.
brain weight : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
brain weight : Previously described QTL for brain weight [56].
brain weight : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
brain weight : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
brain weight : Striatal volume correlates strongly to brain weight.
brain weight : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
brain weight : It has previously been shown that differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number [51, 52].
brain weight : For this reason, brain weight has been suggested to be a good surrogate measure for total cell number in mice, as in humans [53].
brain weights : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
brain weights : We therefore measured subjects representing the full range of brain weights (see Fig 2A).
brain weight : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
brain weight : We have mapped data with and without compensation for variance in brain weight.
node_42
brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
brain volume : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
the volume of the mouse brain : First, it is a large, cytoarchitectonically distinct region comprising approximately 5-6% of the volume of the mouse brain.
brain : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
brain size : The Chr 10 interval has an appreciable effect on brain size.
brain volume : The specific striatal component of the Bsc10a was analyzed by mapping the residual striatal values that corrects for differences in brain volume.
brain : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
Brain volume : Brain volume and neuron number  
Total Brain Volume : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
the volume of the entire brain : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
this value : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
Brain volumes : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
node_44
brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
brain : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Brain volume and neuron number : Brain volume and neuron number  
node_47
striatal volume, neuron-packing density : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
striatal volume, neuron-packing density : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
striatal volume and neuron-packing density : There was in fact a strong inverse relationship between striatal volume and neuron-packing density that led to a remarkably stabile neuron number.
neuronal volume and neuron-packing density : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
striatal volume and neuron packing density : Subsequent measurements of striatal volume and neuron packing density were corrected for volumetric shrinkage.
node_49
neuron-packing density : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
neuron-packing density : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Neuron-packing density : Neuron-packing density ranged from approximately 50,000 to 100,000 neurons/mm3, and the striatal neuron population ranged from 1.4 to 2.5 million.
neuron-packing density : Inbred animals with larger brains had larger striata but lower neuron-packing density resulting in a narrow range of average neuron populations.
Neuron-packing density in the striatum : C. Neuron-packing density in the striatum.
neuron-packing density : In general, brains with smaller striata have greater neuron-packing density (F4,28 = 17.6, P < .001).
Striatal Neuron-Packing Density : There are no significant difference in striatal neuronal number among the five inbred strains (F4,28 = 2.0. ns).  Striatal Neuron-Packing Density.
the packing density of striatal neurons : There is a significant difference among strains in the packing density of striatal neurons (P < .001 for all comparisons).
neuronal packing densities : C57BL/6J (73,100 ± 1,700) differs from all other mice with the exception of DBA/2J. Inbred strains with smaller striatal volumes have higher neuronal packing densities (Fig 1C).
density : As a result of the reciprocal relation between volume and density, there is no significant difference in striatal neuron number among the five strains.
neuron-packing density : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
the neuron-packing density : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
striatal neuron-packing density : Brain weight (A: Χ2 = 2.91, df = 2, ns), striatal volume (B: Χ2 = 1.13, df = 2, ns), striatal neuron-packing density C: Χ2 = 1.64, df = 2, ns), and striatal neuron number (D: Χ2 = 0.73, df = 2, ns) are all normally distributed (Kolmogorov-Smirnov Normality Test).  Figure 3  
striatal neuron-packing density : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
neuron-packing density : Striatal volume negatively correlates with neuron-packing density in these subjects.
striatal : There was in fact a strong inverse relationship between striatal volume and neuron-packing density that led to a remarkably stabile neuron number.
neuron-packing density : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
packing density : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
neuron-packing density : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
Neuron-packing density : Neuron-packing density was computed as the number of cells/mm3 corrected for shrinkage.
node_52
unbiased stereological procedures : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
unbiased stereological procedures : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
unbiased stereological procedures : The second consists of a set of unbiased stereological procedures that can be used to obtain cell counts accurately and efficiently from large numbers of cases [24,25].  
unbiased stereological methods : With a modest sample size such as we have been able to examine using unbiased stereological methods, even a QTL responsible for 30 to 50% of the variance.
node_55
A/J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
A/J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
A/J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
A/J : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
A/J : The striata of BXD5 (31.0 ± 0.9 mm3) and BALB/cJ (32.5 ± 1.6 mm3) mice are significantly larger (P < .001) than those of C57BL/6J (23.6 ± 0.6 mm3), A/J (21.7 ± 1.0 mm3), and DBA/2J (22.8 ± 0.6 mm3) strains.
A/J : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
A/J : A/J has a higher mean density (84,800 ± 3,500 neurons/mm3) than all strains other than DBA/2J (80,400 ± 2,700 neurons/mm3).
A/J : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
A/J : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
A/J : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
A/J : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
A/J : An analysis of RI strains can be quickly extended by generating F1 intercrosses between A/J and the subset of RI strains that have recombinations in the QTL intervals on Chrs 10 and 19.
A/J : Low brain weight strains included A/J (n = 5) and DBA/2J (n = 8).
A/J : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_57
A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
Strain : Phenotypes  Strain differences  Brain Weight and Striatal Volume.
Five strains : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
inbred strains of mice : Figure 1  Histograms of histologic phenotypes for inbred strains of mice.
the five inbred strains : There are no significant difference in striatal neuronal number among the five inbred strains (F4,28 = 2.0. ns).  Striatal Neuron-Packing Density.
the five strains : As a result of the reciprocal relation between volume and density, there is no significant difference in striatal neuron number among the five strains.
five strains : Our comparisons are based on five strains, and one consequence of this modest sample size is that sampling errors and intraclass correlations may bias the results [31].
this modest sample size : Our comparisons are based on five strains, and one consequence of this modest sample size is that sampling errors and intraclass correlations may bias the results [31].
inbred strains : In this crucial respect, results from the genetically heterogeneous F2 animals differ from those of inbred strains.
inbred strains of mice : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
inbred strains :  Based on these findings, we anticipated significant differences in the striatum of inbred strains.
strain : We did find large strain differences in volume.
our set of five highly divergent strains : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
strains that we have sampled : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
the inbred strains : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
node_58
A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
five inbred strains : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
node_60
C57BL/6J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
C57BL/6J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
C57BL/6J : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
C57BL/6J : The striata of BXD5 (31.0 ± 0.9 mm3) and BALB/cJ (32.5 ± 1.6 mm3) mice are significantly larger (P < .001) than those of C57BL/6J (23.6 ± 0.6 mm3), A/J (21.7 ± 1.0 mm3), and DBA/2J (22.8 ± 0.6 mm3) strains.
C57BL/6J : C57BL/6J (73,100 ± 1,700) differs from all other mice with the exception of DBA/2J. Inbred strains with smaller striatal volumes have higher neuronal packing densities (Fig 1C).
C57BL/6J : Total striatal neuron numbers ranges over a very modest range - from a low of 1.72 ± .015 million in C57BL/6J to a high of 1.93 ± .035 million in BXD5.
strains C57BL/6J : BXD5 is a recombinant inbred strain initially generated by crossing strains C57BL/6J and DBA/2J.
C57BL/6J : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
C57BL/6J : This C57BL/6J region corresponds to the peak LRS score.
C57BL/6J mice : Granule cell numbers in NZB/BINJ and DBA/2 were 37-118% greater than C57BL/6J mice, and differences in volume were even larger (up to 150% larger in the DBA/2 as compared to the C57BL/6J mice).
the C57BL/6J mice : Granule cell numbers in NZB/BINJ and DBA/2 were 37-118% greater than C57BL/6J mice, and differences in volume were even larger (up to 150% larger in the DBA/2 as compared to the C57BL/6J mice).
C57BL/6J : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
C57BL/6J : Mid and high brain weight strains include C57BL/6J (n = 10), BALB/cJ (n = 5), and BXD5 (n = 6, formally this recombinant inbred strain is known as BXD-5/Ty).
C57BL/6J : The BXD5 strain used as the paternal strain in this intercross is a recombinant inbred strain that was derived by crossing C57BL/6J and DBA/2J lines of mice [58].
node_62
DBA/2J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
DBA/2J : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
DBA/2J : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
DBA/2J : The striata of BXD5 (31.0 ± 0.9 mm3) and BALB/cJ (32.5 ± 1.6 mm3) mice are significantly larger (P < .001) than those of C57BL/6J (23.6 ± 0.6 mm3), A/J (21.7 ± 1.0 mm3), and DBA/2J (22.8 ± 0.6 mm3) strains.
DBA/2J : A/J has a higher mean density (84,800 ± 3,500 neurons/mm3) than all strains other than DBA/2J (80,400 ± 2,700 neurons/mm3).
DBA/2J : C57BL/6J (73,100 ± 1,700) differs from all other mice with the exception of DBA/2J. Inbred strains with smaller striatal volumes have higher neuronal packing densities (Fig 1C).
strains : BXD5 is a recombinant inbred strain initially generated by crossing strains C57BL/6J and DBA/2J.
DBA/2J : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
DBA/2J : Low brain weight strains included A/J (n = 5) and DBA/2J (n = 8).
DBA/2J lines of mice : The BXD5 strain used as the paternal strain in this intercross is a recombinant inbred strain that was derived by crossing C57BL/6J and DBA/2J lines of mice [58].
node_64
BALB/cJ : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
BALB/cJ : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
BALB/cJ : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
BALB/cJ : The striata of BXD5 (31.0 ± 0.9 mm3) and BALB/cJ (32.5 ± 1.6 mm3) mice are significantly larger (P < .001) than those of C57BL/6J (23.6 ± 0.6 mm3), A/J (21.7 ± 1.0 mm3), and DBA/2J (22.8 ± 0.6 mm3) strains.
BALB/cJ : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
BALB/cJ : BALB/cJ (57,700 ± 2,500 neurons/mm3) and BXD5 (62,700 ± 2,600 neurons/mm3) do not differ significantly from each other, but do differ from all other strains.
BALB/cJ : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
BALB/cJ : Mid and high brain weight strains include C57BL/6J (n = 10), BALB/cJ (n = 5), and BXD5 (n = 6, formally this recombinant inbred strain is known as BXD-5/Ty).
node_66
BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
BXD5 : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
BXD5 : The striata of BXD5 (31.0 ± 0.9 mm3) and BALB/cJ (32.5 ± 1.6 mm3) mice are significantly larger (P < .001) than those of C57BL/6J (23.6 ± 0.6 mm3), A/J (21.7 ± 1.0 mm3), and DBA/2J (22.8 ± 0.6 mm3) strains.
BXD5 : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
BXD5 : BALB/cJ (57,700 ± 2,500 neurons/mm3) and BXD5 (62,700 ± 2,600 neurons/mm3) do not differ significantly from each other, but do differ from all other strains.
BXD5 : Total striatal neuron numbers ranges over a very modest range - from a low of 1.72 ± .015 million in C57BL/6J to a high of 1.93 ± .035 million in BXD5.
BXD5 : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
BXD5 : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
BXD5 : * Alleles inherited from BXD5 that increase a value are defined as positive additive effects.
BXD5 : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
BXD5 : BXD5 is a recombinant inbred strain initially generated by crossing strains C57BL/6J and DBA/2J.
BXD5 : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
BXD5 : We estimate a single B allele inherited from the BXD5 parent increases striatal volume by approximately 2.0-2.5 mm3.
BXD5 : Mid and high brain weight strains include C57BL/6J (n = 10), BALB/cJ (n = 5), and BXD5 (n = 6, formally this recombinant inbred strain is known as BXD-5/Ty).
this recombinant inbred strain : Mid and high brain weight strains include C57BL/6J (n = 10), BALB/cJ (n = 5), and BXD5 (n = 6, formally this recombinant inbred strain is known as BXD-5/Ty).
BXD5 : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
The BXD5 strain used as the paternal strain in this intercross : The BXD5 strain used as the paternal strain in this intercross is a recombinant inbred strain that was derived by crossing C57BL/6J and DBA/2J lines of mice [58].
node_68
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : Brain weight, brain and striatal volume, neuron-packing density and number were estimated bilaterally using unbiased stereological procedures in five inbred strains (A/J, C57BL/6J, DBA/2J, BALB/cJ, and BXD5) and an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5.
intercross : In contrast, there was a strong positive correlation between volume and neuron number among intercross progeny.
node_76
2.5 million : Neuron-packing density ranged from approximately 50,000 to 100,000 neurons/mm3, and the striatal neuron population ranged from 1.4 to 2.5 million.
2.5 million : Neuron-packing density ranged from approximately 50,000 to 100,000 neurons/mm3, and the striatal neuron population ranged from 1.4 to 2.5 million.
2.5 million : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
node_89
two quantitative trait loci : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
two quantitative trait loci : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters : Conclusion  We have discovered remarkable numerical and volumetric variation in the mouse striatum, and we have been able to map two QTLs that modulate independent anatomic parameters.
node_91
quantitative trait loci : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
quantitative trait loci : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
QTLs : We mapped two quantitative trait loci (QTLs) with selective effects on striatal architecture.
node_94
Bsc10a : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
Bsc10a : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
the central region of Chr 10 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
The Chr 10 interval : The Chr 10 interval has an appreciable effect on brain size.
the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186 : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
The Chr 10 locus : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
its : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
this Chr 10 locus : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
Brain size control 10a : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
the Bsc10a : The specific striatal component of the Bsc10a was analyzed by mapping the residual striatal values that corrects for differences in brain volume.
Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05 : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
Bsc10a : Isogenic sets of RI-backcross progeny can be used to test specific models of gene action, for example, the dominance of the B allele at Bsc10a.
Bsc10a : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
the central portion of Chr 10 : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
the Bsc10a interval : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
Bsc10a : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
node_97
Chr 10 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
Chr 10 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
chromosome 10 :  The strongest linkage was found between variation in striatal volume and an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM.
Chr 10 : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
Chr 10 : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
Chr. 10 :  A. Plot for Striatal volume on Chr. 10.
Chr 10 : The Chr 10 interval has an appreciable effect on brain size.
Chr 10 : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
Chr 10 : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
Chr 10 : Linkage on Chr 19 is not affected at all by remapping with control for the striatal volume locus on Chr 10.
Chr 10 : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
chromosome 10 : We have succeeded in mapping one QTL with somewhat more intense effects on the volume of the striatum than the rest of the brain to the proximal half of chromosome 10.
Chrs 10 : An analysis of RI strains can be quickly extended by generating F1 intercrosses between A/J and the subset of RI strains that have recombinations in the QTL intervals on Chrs 10 and 19.
Chr 10 : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
node_99
17.5 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
17.5 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
17.5 : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
node_101
D10Mit186 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
D10Mit186 : Bsc10a maps to the central region of Chr 10 (LRS of 17.5 near D10Mit186) and has intense effects on striatal volume and moderate effects on brain volume.
D10Mit186 : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
D10Mit186 : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
node_106
Stnn19a : Stnn19a maps to distal Chr 19 (LRS of 15 at D19Mit123) and is associated with differences of up to 400,000 neurons among animals.
Stnn19a : Stnn19a maps to distal Chr 19 (LRS of 15 at D19Mit123) and is associated with differences of up to 400,000 neurons among animals.
distal Chr 19 : Stnn19a maps to distal Chr 19 (LRS of 15 at D19Mit123) and is associated with differences of up to 400,000 neurons among animals.
a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number : We identified a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number.
distal Chr 19 : We identified a second strong candidate interval on distal Chr 19 that may modulate striatal neuron number.
this interval : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
this locus : The two-tailed genome-wide probability of this locus is at the threshold for declaring a QTL (p = 0.035 ± 0.01 two-tailed for an additive model and 0.08 ± 0.2 for a free model).
distal Chr 19 : No other chromosomal interval has an LRS score remotely as high as distal Chr 19.
the Chr 19 interval : The next highest LRS value is only 7.2 on Chr 1 near D1Mit65 and has a point-wise probability that is 50 times higher than the Chr 19 interval.
the distal chromosome 19 interval : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
Striatal Neuron Number 19a : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
this interval : Allelic differences in this interval account for up to 30% of the total variance in striatal neuron number.
the Chr 19 interval : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
distal Chr 19 : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
Chr 19 intervals : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
the distal end of chromosome 19 : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
intervals on Chrs : An analysis of RI strains can be quickly extended by generating F1 intercrosses between A/J and the subset of RI strains that have recombinations in the QTL intervals on Chrs 10 and 19.
the distal part of chromosome 19 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
node_110
D19Mit123 : Stnn19a maps to distal Chr 19 (LRS of 15 at D19Mit123) and is associated with differences of up to 400,000 neurons among animals.
D19Mit123 : Stnn19a maps to distal Chr 19 (LRS of 15 at D19Mit123) and is associated with differences of up to 400,000 neurons among animals.
D19Mit123 : The LRS peaks at 15.0 (a LOD of 3.26) at one of our more distal markers (D19Mit123, 51 cM, p = .00055).
node_120
The dorsal striatum : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
The dorsal striatum : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
the dorsal striatum : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
the dorsal striatum : This non-predictable variation is of particular interest to us because it is generated in large part by genes that have more intense or even selective effects on the dorsal striatum than other brain regions.
node_122
the basal forebrain : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
the basal forebrain : The dorsal striatum is a massive nucleus in the basal forebrain that plays a pivotal role in modulating motor activity and higher cognitive function.
the basal forebrain : In addition, Vax1 interacts with several molecules including sonic hedgehog,Pax2, Pax6, and Rx that are known to be important during development of the basal forebrain [27, 50].  
node_131
humans : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
humans : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
humans : In the case of Huntington disease the loss of 15-30% of the normal complement of medium spiny neurons leads to distinct movement disorder in both humans and transgenic mouse models [14-17].
humans : For this reason, brain weight has been suggested to be a good surrogate measure for total cell number in mice, as in humans [53].
node_133
an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons : Approximately 90% of all neurons in the striatum - 1.5 to 2.5 million in mice [1,2] and 110-200 million in humans [3,4] - belong to an unusual type 'of inhibitory projection cell referred to as medium spiny neurons [5-8].
medium spiny neurons : Numbers of medium spiny neurons and ratios of these and less numerous striatal interneurons are critical variables that influence motor performance and aspects of cognition.
medium spiny neurons : In the case of Huntington disease the loss of 15-30% of the normal complement of medium spiny neurons leads to distinct movement disorder in both humans and transgenic mouse models [14-17].
medium spiny neurons : The striatum may be a special case - a region in which numbers of medium spiny neurons is more tightly regulated than neuron populations in some other regions.
node_137
patch : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
patch : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
striatal patch : This large functional counting box (80 x 195 x 20 μm) was chosen to minimize sampling variance by ensuring an equitable sampling of striatal patch and matrix.
node_139
patch and matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
patch and matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
striatal patch and matrix : This large functional counting box (80 x 195 x 20 μm) was chosen to minimize sampling variance by ensuring an equitable sampling of striatal patch and matrix.
these large fields : Two of these large fields were counted in each of the hemispheres.
node_140
patch and matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
patch and matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
two major subpopulations : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
node_142
matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
matrix : Striatal neurons are divided into two major subpopulations (patch and matrix), that have somewhat different gene expression profiles and have different patterns of pre- and postsynaptic connections [9-13].  
striatal : This large functional counting box (80 x 195 x 20 μm) was chosen to minimize sampling variance by ensuring an equitable sampling of striatal patch and matrix.
node_144
Numbers of medium spiny neurons : Numbers of medium spiny neurons and ratios of these and less numerous striatal interneurons are critical variables that influence motor performance and aspects of cognition.
Numbers of medium spiny neurons : Numbers of medium spiny neurons and ratios of these and less numerous striatal interneurons are critical variables that influence motor performance and aspects of cognition.
these : Numbers of medium spiny neurons and ratios of these and less numerous striatal interneurons are critical variables that influence motor performance and aspects of cognition.
numbers of medium spiny neurons : The striatum may be a special case - a region in which numbers of medium spiny neurons is more tightly regulated than neuron populations in some other regions.
node_148
Huntington disease : In the case of Huntington disease the loss of 15-30% of the normal complement of medium spiny neurons leads to distinct movement disorder in both humans and transgenic mouse models [14-17].
Huntington disease : In the case of Huntington disease the loss of 15-30% of the normal complement of medium spiny neurons leads to distinct movement disorder in both humans and transgenic mouse models [14-17].
Huntington disease : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
node_152
The subset of genes that normally control the : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
The subset of genes that normally control the : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
node_154
the proliferation : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
the proliferation : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
neuron proliferation : Finally, recent experiments on the molecular control of telencephalic development have highlighted a number of genes that influence neuron proliferation and differentiation of the striatum and other neighboring forebrain structures [18][26-30].
node_157
survival of striatal neurons : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
survival of striatal neurons : The subset of genes that normally control the proliferation, differentiation, and survival of striatal neurons [18-20] are therefore of considerable importance in ensuring adaptive behavior at maturity.
survival of striatal neurons : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
node_160
this study : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
this study : In this study we use a forward genetic approach [21, 22] to begin to map and characterize members of the subset of normally polymorphic genes that specifically modulate the production and survival of striatal neurons.
this study : A total of 518 of these ABDF2 progeny were generated, but for this study we selected a subset of 44 cases, of which 36 were fully genotyped (see below).
this study : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
this study : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
the current experiment : This post-hoc test is functionally identical to a Fisher PLSD, but the alpha level is more conservative (.005).  Supplementary Material  StrAnatData.xls  This file contains anatomic data for each of the subjects used in the current experiment.  
the current experiment : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
This work : This work was supported, in part, by grants HD20806 and NS35485 from the Public Health Service of the USA.
node_167
striatal cell populations : Our analysis of the neurogenetic control of striatal cell populations relies on the combination of two complementary quantitative approaches.
striatal cell populations : Our analysis of the neurogenetic control of striatal cell populations relies on the combination of two complementary quantitative approaches.
cell counts : The second consists of a set of unbiased stereological procedures that can be used to obtain cell counts accurately and efficiently from large numbers of cases [24,25].  
striatal cell populations : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
node_169
two complementary quantitative approaches : Our analysis of the neurogenetic control of striatal cell populations relies on the combination of two complementary quantitative approaches.
two complementary quantitative approaches : Our analysis of the neurogenetic control of striatal cell populations relies on the combination of two complementary quantitative approaches.
these : The first of these, complex trait analysis, is a comparatively new genetic method that makes it possible to map individual loci that underlie polygenic traits [22,23].
node_173
complex trait analysis : The first of these, complex trait analysis, is a comparatively new genetic method that makes it possible to map individual loci that underlie polygenic traits [22,23].
complex trait analysis : The first of these, complex trait analysis, is a comparatively new genetic method that makes it possible to map individual loci that underlie polygenic traits [22,23].
The first of these : The first of these, complex trait analysis, is a comparatively new genetic method that makes it possible to map individual loci that underlie polygenic traits [22,23].
node_185
the mouse brain : First, it is a large, cytoarchitectonically distinct region comprising approximately 5-6% of the volume of the mouse brain.
the mouse brain : First, it is a large, cytoarchitectonically distinct region comprising approximately 5-6% of the volume of the mouse brain.
Mouse Brain : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
Mouse Brain : This large RI set has already been processed and regenotyped and is now part of the Mouse Brain Library (see  and ).
Mouse Brain : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
Mouse Brain : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
node_189
quantitative trait loci : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
quantitative trait loci : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
QTL : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
QTL : QTL Analysis  
node_190
quantitative trait loci : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
quantitative trait loci : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
QTLs : Second, the dorsal striatum has a comparatively homogenous cellular composition, potentially reducing the number of quantitative trait loci (QTLs) that affect striatal neuron number.
node_195
telencephalic development : Finally, recent experiments on the molecular control of telencephalic development have highlighted a number of genes that influence neuron proliferation and differentiation of the striatum and other neighboring forebrain structures [18][26-30].
telencephalic development : Finally, recent experiments on the molecular control of telencephalic development have highlighted a number of genes that influence neuron proliferation and differentiation of the striatum and other neighboring forebrain structures [18][26-30].
telencephalic development : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
development : Vax1 is localized during development to the anterior ventral forebrain, and is expressed in the striatum during embryogenesis [28].
node_215
a quantitative genetic dissection : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
a quantitative genetic dissection : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
our genetic dissection of the striatum : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
dissection : The head with brain was placed a vial with the last fixative and stored at 4°C until dissection.  Following dissection, the brains were weighed immediately.
dissection : The head with brain was placed a vial with the last fixative and stored at 4°C until dissection.  Following dissection, the brains were weighed immediately.
node_218
QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum : The second section is a quantitative genetic dissection and QTL analysis of variation in the size and neuronal population of the mouse striatum.
QTL Analysis : QTL Analysis  
The analysis in this section : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
node_231
low, mid, and high brain weights : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
low, mid, and high brain weights : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
the three categories :  A. Brain weight differences are apparent between the three categories (F4,28 = 82.1, P < .001).
node_232
low : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
low : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
low brain weight : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
low brain weight : C57BL6/J mice differ from the high, but not low brain weight strains (F4,28 = 28.9, P < .001).
Low brain weight : Low brain weight strains included A/J (n = 5) and DBA/2J (n = 8).
low brain weight : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_235
high brain weights : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
high brain weights : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
high brain weight : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
high : C57BL6/J mice differ from the high, but not low brain weight strains (F4,28 = 28.9, P < .001).
node_238
Fig 1A : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
Fig 1A : Five strains were chosen to represent low, mid, and high brain weights (Fig 1A).
A :  A. Brain weight differences are apparent between the three categories (F4,28 = 82.1, P < .001).
node_245
BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg) : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg) : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
the high brain weight strains : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
the high : C57BL6/J mice differ from the high, but not low brain weight strains (F4,28 = 28.9, P < .001).
node_246
BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg) : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg) : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
the two high strains : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
node_250
5 mg : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
5 mg : Brain weights of the two high strains, BXD5 (540 ± 9 mg SEM) and BALB/cJ (527 ± 13 mg), are significantly greater (P < .001) than that of C57BL/6J (476 ± 5 mg).
5 mg : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
5 mg : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
5 mg : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
node_254
A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J : Similarly, the brain weights of A/J (395 ± 5 mg) and DBA/2J (403 ± 5 mg) are significantly lower than those of the other three strains (P < .001).
A/J, DBA.2J : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
node_259
differences in striatal volume : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
differences in striatal volume : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
differences in volume : Granule cell numbers in NZB/BINJ and DBA/2 were 37-118% greater than C57BL/6J mice, and differences in volume were even larger (up to 150% larger in the DBA/2 as compared to the C57BL/6J mice).
the differences in volume : What was surprising was that in our set of five highly divergent strains the differences in volume were not matched by significant differences in neuron number.
node_262
differences in brain weight : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
differences in brain weight : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
Brain weight differences :  A. Brain weight differences are apparent between the three categories (F4,28 = 82.1, P < .001).
differences in brain weight : It has previously been shown that differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number [51, 52].
node_264
differences in brain : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
differences in brain : As anticipated, differences in striatal volume correspond well with differences in brain weight and volume.
differences in brain volume : The specific striatal component of the Bsc10a was analyzed by mapping the residual striatal values that corrects for differences in brain volume.
node_274
histologic phenotypes : Figure 1  Histograms of histologic phenotypes for inbred strains of mice.
histologic phenotypes : Figure 1  Histograms of histologic phenotypes for inbred strains of mice.
Histologic Phenotypes : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
node_288
A/J, DBA.2J : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
A/J, DBA.2J : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
the low brain weight strains : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
node_294
BALB/cJ, BXD5 : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
BALB/cJ, BXD5 : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
the high brain weight strains : There are significant differences in striatal volume between the low brain weight strains (A/J, DBA.2J) and the high brain weight strains (BALB/cJ, BXD5).
node_302
C : C. Neuron-packing density in the striatum.
C : C. Neuron-packing density in the striatum.
Fig 1C : C57BL/6J (73,100 ± 1,700) differs from all other mice with the exception of DBA/2J. Inbred strains with smaller striatal volumes have higher neuronal packing densities (Fig 1C).
node_306
smaller striata : In general, brains with smaller striata have greater neuron-packing density (F4,28 = 17.6, P < .001).
smaller striata : In general, brains with smaller striata have greater neuron-packing density (F4,28 = 17.6, P < .001).
small striata : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
node_345
a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
this set of animals : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
node_348
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
the genetically heterogeneous F2 animals : In this crucial respect, results from the genetically heterogeneous F2 animals differ from those of inbred strains.
ABDF2 subjects : Figure 2  Histograms of distribution of dependent measures in ABDF2 subjects.
subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
these subjects : Striatal volume negatively correlates with neuron-packing density in these subjects.
node_349
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5 : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals : We therefore also analyzed a larger sample of genetically heterogeneous ABF2 intercross animals (an F2 intercross between A/J and BXD5).
node_354
the distribution of all four dependent measures : We first determined that the distribution of all four dependent measures were normally distributed (Fig 2), before subjecting the data to correlational analysis.
the distribution of all four dependent measures : We first determined that the distribution of all four dependent measures were normally distributed (Fig 2), before subjecting the data to correlational analysis.
distribution of dependent measures in ABDF2 subjects : Figure 2  Histograms of distribution of dependent measures in ABDF2 subjects.
node_356
Fig 2 : We first determined that the distribution of all four dependent measures were normally distributed (Fig 2), before subjecting the data to correlational analysis.
Fig 2 : We first determined that the distribution of all four dependent measures were normally distributed (Fig 2), before subjecting the data to correlational analysis.
Figure 2 : Figure 2  Histograms of distribution of dependent measures in ABDF2 subjects.
node_362
Fig 3A : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
Fig 3A : In this set of animals brain weight correlates significantly with striatal volume (r = .82, df = 42, P < .001, Fig 3A).
A : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
node_366
the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
this relationship : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
node_370
Fig 3B : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
Fig 3B : Striatal volume is negatively correlated with neuron-packing density overall (r = -0.32, df = 42, P < .05), again indicating that the greater the striatal volume, the lower the neuron-packing density (Fig 3B).
B : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
node_374
the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
this crucial respect : In this crucial respect, results from the genetically heterogeneous F2 animals differ from those of inbred strains.
node_379
Fig 3C : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
Fig 3C : Despite this relationship, the total population of striatal neurons correlates positively with striatal volume in this larger sample (r = .60, df = 42, P < .001; Fig 3C).
C : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
node_398
ABF2 : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
ABF2 : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
node_405
striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number : Scatterplots of subjects from an F2 intercross between a BXD5 and A/J inbred strains (ABF2, N = 44) illustrating correlations of striatal volume with brains weight (A), striatal neuron-packing density (B), and striatal neuron number (C).
Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number : Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number  Neurons were counted using the 3-dimensional counting software of Williams and Rakic [24].
node_414
both brain weight and neuron number : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
both brain weight and neuron number : There are significant positive correlations between striatal volume and both brain weight and neuron number.
these two variables : Taken together with previous reports [51-53], we speculate that while total neuron number in the cerebrum may relate to total brain weight, the relationship of these two variables is flexible at the regional level.
node_426
two traits : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
two traits : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values) : The analysis in this section is focused principally on two traits: striatal volume (absolute and residual values), and striatal neuron number (also absolute and residual values).
node_436
Two additional traits : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
Two additional traits : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
node_441
non-striatal brain weight : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
non-striatal brain weight : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
This last parameter : This last parameter was estimated by subtracting the estimated bilateral striatal weight (assuming a specific gravity of 1.0) from that of the whole brain.
node_443
Table 1 : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
Table 1 : Two additional traits were mapped to assess specificity of the effects of putative QTL-bearing intervals, namely brain weight and non-striatal brain weight (Table 1).
Table 1 : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
Table 1 : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
node_446
the estimated bilateral striatal weight : This last parameter was estimated by subtracting the estimated bilateral striatal weight (assuming a specific gravity of 1.0) from that of the whole brain.
the estimated bilateral striatal weight : This last parameter was estimated by subtracting the estimated bilateral striatal weight (assuming a specific gravity of 1.0) from that of the whole brain.
The unadjusted striatal estimates : The unadjusted striatal estimates vary to a large extent as a result of variation in total brain weight.
node_451
Linkage : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
Linkage : Table 1  Linkage Statistics for Striatal Volume and Neuron Number  *
linkage : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the linkage : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
linkage : The 2-LOD support interval of linkage was estimated directly from interval maps.
node_457
Alleles inherited from BXD5 that increase a value : * Alleles inherited from BXD5 that increase a value are defined as positive additive effects.
Alleles inherited from BXD5 that increase a value : * Alleles inherited from BXD5 that increase a value are defined as positive additive effects.
this sample population : The two bold loci marked with asterisks achieve genome-wide significance in this sample population.
Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
node_460
LRS : † LRS values can be converted to LOD scores by dividing by 4.6.
LRS : † LRS values can be converted to LOD scores by dividing by 4.6.
LRS : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
LRS : This C57BL/6J region corresponds to the peak LRS score.
the LRS : Peak values for the LRS are around 30 cM. B.
the LRS : Peak values for the LRS are around 50 cM.  
node_463
LOD scores : † LRS values can be converted to LOD scores by dividing by 4.6.
LOD scores : † LRS values can be converted to LOD scores by dividing by 4.6.
the LOD score : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
LOD scores : Figure 4  Plots of LOD scores and LRS for each of the two traits.
LOD scores : LRS scores can be converted to LOD scores by dividing by 4.6.
node_467
Trait : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
Trait : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the traits : Units are the same as those of the traits (volume in mm3 or numbers of cells).
node_468
Trait : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
Trait : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the phenotype used in linkage analysis : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_472
Marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
Marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_473
Marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
Marker : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_477
Chr : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
Chr : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the chromosome on which the marker is located : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_479
the chromosome : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the chromosome : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
which : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_487
P : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
P : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive : Column headings:Trait, the phenotype used in linkage analysis; Marker, the symbol of the microsatellite loci used to genotype mice; Chr, the chromosome on which the marker is located; LRS is the likelihood ratio statistic (4.6 x the LOD score); %Var is the percentage of the total phenotypic variance apparently accounted for by differences in genotype in the an interval defined by the marker; P, the point-wise probability that the linkage is a false positive.
node_496
an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM :  The strongest linkage was found between variation in striatal volume and an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM.
an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM :  The strongest linkage was found between variation in striatal volume and an interval on chromosome 10 between the markers D10Mit194 at 29 cM and D10Mit209 at 49 cM.
this 20 cM interval : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
This locus : This locus accounts for as much as a third of the total phenotypic variance in striatal volume and as much as 50% of the genotypic variance (h2 = 0.39).
this Chr 10 interval : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
node_499
The likelihood ratio statistic : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
The likelihood ratio statistic : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
the peak LRS score : This C57BL/6J region corresponds to the peak LRS score.
node_500
The likelihood ratio statistic : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
The likelihood ratio statistic : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
a value that can be read as a chi-square : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
node_506
a LOD score of 3.8 : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
a LOD score of 3.8 : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
this strength : The genome-wide probability of achieving a linkage of this strength by chance is <0.05.
node_508
Fig 4A : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
Fig 4A : The likelihood ratio statistic - a value that can be read as a chi-square - peaks in this 20 cM interval at 17.5 and is associated with a P value of 0.00016 (Table 1), equivalent to a LOD score of 3.8 (Fig 4A).
A :  A. Plot for Striatal volume on Chr. 10.
node_519
the AA genotype : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
the AA genotype : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
The AA genotype : The AA genotype has an average residual population that is 116,000 less than the mean (i.e., a residual of -116,000; n = 12), the AB heterozygotes have an average of -8,000 neurons (n = 18), and the BB homozygotes have an average of 290,000 neurons (n = 6).
node_522
AB : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
AB : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
AB genotypes : The insignificant difference between BB and AB genotypes suggests that the B allele is dominant.
AB : The AA genotype has an average residual population that is 116,000 less than the mean (i.e., a residual of -116,000; n = 12), the AB heterozygotes have an average of -8,000 neurons (n = 18), and the BB homozygotes have an average of 290,000 neurons (n = 6).
node_524
BB genotypes : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
BB genotypes : Alleles in this Chr 10 interval that are inherited from the BXD5 parental strain contribute to a significantly larger striatum than do alleles inherited from A/J. Mean bilateral volume corrected for shrinkage for the AA genotype at D10Mit186 (n = 11) is 25.3 ± 1.3 mm3 whereas that for AB and BB genotypes are 29.1 ± 0.7 mm3 and 30.0 ± 0.5 mm3 (n = 14 and 11), respectively.
BB : The insignificant difference between BB and AB genotypes suggests that the B allele is dominant.
BB : The AA genotype has an average residual population that is 116,000 less than the mean (i.e., a residual of -116,000; n = 12), the AB heterozygotes have an average of -8,000 neurons (n = 18), and the BB homozygotes have an average of 290,000 neurons (n = 6).
node_528
the B allele : The insignificant difference between BB and AB genotypes suggests that the B allele is dominant.
the B allele : The insignificant difference between BB and AB genotypes suggests that the B allele is dominant.
the B allele at Bsc10a : Isogenic sets of RI-backcross progeny can be used to test specific models of gene action, for example, the dominance of the B allele at Bsc10a.
node_536
a short interval between 40 and 50 cM : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
a short interval between 40 and 50 cM : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
This C57BL/6J region : This C57BL/6J region corresponds to the peak LRS score.
node_538
50 cM : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
50 cM : Most of the proximal part of Chr 10 in BXD5 is derived from DBA/2J, but a short interval between 40 and 50 cM is derived exclusively from C57BL/6J.
50 cM : Peak values for the LRS are around 50 cM.  
node_556
B : Peak values for the LRS are around 30 cM. B.
B : Peak values for the LRS are around 30 cM. B.
Fig 4B : In mapping neuron number we actually used the residual cell population as a trait, and we are therefore confident that this interval has a selective, although not necessarily exclusive, effect on numbers of neurons in striatum (Fig 4B).
node_559
Chr. 19 : Plot for striatal neuron number on Chr. 19.
Chr. 19 : Plot for striatal neuron number on Chr. 19.
Chr 19 : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
Chr 19 : Linkage on Chr 19 is not affected at all by remapping with control for the striatal volume locus on Chr 10.
Chr 19 : Thus, Chr 10 and Chr 19 intervals do not interact or cooperate in controlling striatal volume or neuron number.
chromosome 19 : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
Chr 19 : We have also discovered linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons.
Chrs : An analysis of RI strains can be quickly extended by generating F1 intercrosses between A/J and the subset of RI strains that have recombinations in the QTL intervals on Chrs 10 and 19.
chromosome 19 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
node_567
Variance in brain weight : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
Variance in brain weight : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
variation in total brain weight : The unadjusted striatal estimates vary to a large extent as a result of variation in total brain weight.
variation in brain weight : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
variance in brain weight : We have mapped data with and without compensation for variance in brain weight.
node_573
an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186 : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186 : Variance in brain weight minus that of the striatum is associated with an LRS of 14.2 in the same location between D10Mit106 and D10Mit186.
the LRS : The specific effect of a B allele is reduced from 2.5 mm3 to 0.5-1.0 mm3, and the LRS is reduced to 6.9, a value which still has a point-wise probability of only 0.03, indicating a significant independent effect.  
node_581
pleiotropic effects on the CNS : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
pleiotropic effects on the CNS : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
effects : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
node_583
the CNS : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
the CNS : The Chr 10 locus clearly has pleiotropic effects on the CNS, but its effect on the striatum is more intense.
CNS : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
the CNS : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
CNS : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
CNS : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_593
Brain size control 10a : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
Brain size control 10a : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
Bsc10a : Nonetheless, until we know more about the scope of effects, we have opted to give this Chr 10 locus a generic name, Brain size control 10a (Bsc10a).
node_609
D19Mit123 : The LRS peaks at 15.0 (a LOD of 3.26) at one of our more distal markers (D19Mit123, 51 cM, p = .00055).
D19Mit123 : The LRS peaks at 15.0 (a LOD of 3.26) at one of our more distal markers (D19Mit123, 51 cM, p = .00055).
one of our more distal markers : The LRS peaks at 15.0 (a LOD of 3.26) at one of our more distal markers (D19Mit123, 51 cM, p = .00055).
node_627
the three genotypes : Corresponding absolute numbers of striatal neurons for the three genotypes are 1.8, 1.9, and 2.2 million.
the three genotypes : Corresponding absolute numbers of striatal neurons for the three genotypes are 1.8, 1.9, and 2.2 million.
all three genotypes : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
node_638
Striatal Neuron Number 19a : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
Striatal Neuron Number 19a : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
Stnn19a : Given these findings we have given the distal chromosome 19 interval the name Striatal Neuron Number 19a (Stnn19a).
node_647
Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts : Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts (LRS of 15.0 vs. 11.9).
Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts : Residual neuron counts have a higher LRS than the total neuron counts (LRS of 15.0 vs. 11.9).
This : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
node_654
the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum : This indicates that the Chr 19 interval is likely to have selective effect on the striatum.
this hypothesis : Consistent with this hypothesis, the LRS for brain weight on distal Chr 19 is under 1.0, and weights of all three genotypes average 480 ± 5 mg.
node_666
Linkage on Chr 19 : Linkage on Chr 19 is not affected at all by remapping with control for the striatal volume locus on Chr 10.
Linkage on Chr 19 : Linkage on Chr 19 is not affected at all by remapping with control for the striatal volume locus on Chr 10.
linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons : We have also discovered linkage on Chr 19 to variation in the total number of striatal neurons.
node_680
the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice : Nonetheless, a significant fraction of the variation in both striatal volume and neuron number among inbred strains of mice can not be predicted on the basis of brain weight or volume.
This non-predictable variation : This non-predictable variation is of particular interest to us because it is generated in large part by genes that have more intense or even selective effects on the dorsal striatum than other brain regions.
it : This non-predictable variation is of particular interest to us because it is generated in large part by genes that have more intense or even selective effects on the dorsal striatum than other brain regions.
node_702
a QTL : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
a QTL : We have also mapped a QTL with selective effects on number of neurons in the striatum to the distal end of chromosome 19.
QTL :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
QTL : An analysis of RI strains can be quickly extended by generating F1 intercrosses between A/J and the subset of RI strains that have recombinations in the QTL intervals on Chrs 10 and 19.
QTL : A major goal of QTL mapping is to define loci that affect critical phenotypes with sufficient precision to generate short lists of candidate genes.
node_709
Between-strain variability : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
Between-strain variability : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
among-strain variation : There is also substantial among-strain variation in other structures in the nervous system including the nucleus of the solitary tract [37], the spinal nucleus of the bulbocavernosus [38], and retinal ganglion cells [39, 40].
variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
node_713
cell populations : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
cell populations : Between-strain variability  Variation in the size of CNS regions and cell populations is already known to be substantial in the striatum and in many other regions of the CNS.
cell populations : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_717
varies : The number of striatal cholinergic neurons, for example, varies 50% among 26 BXD RI lines [32].
varies : The number of striatal cholinergic neurons, for example, varies 50% among 26 BXD RI lines [32].
this variation : Interestingly, this variation appears to be unrelated to susceptibility to haloperidol-induced catalepsy.
node_725
volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
volume : Granule cell numbers in NZB/BINJ and DBA/2 were 37-118% greater than C57BL/6J mice, and differences in volume were even larger (up to 150% larger in the DBA/2 as compared to the C57BL/6J mice).
node_727
the pyramidal : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
the pyramidal : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
the pyramidal cell layers : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
node_729
dentate cell layers of the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
dentate cell layers of the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
node_731
the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
the hippocampus : More recent experiments using stereologic techniques have reported substantial variation in both neuron number and volume of the pyramidal and dentate cell layers of the hippocampus [36].
the hippocampus : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
node_741
these results : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
these results : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
these findings :  Based on these findings, we anticipated significant differences in the striatum of inbred strains.
node_746
the CNS of mice : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
the CNS of mice : Taken together, these results point to a high level of variability in neuron number in the CNS of mice.
the mouse CNS : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
node_768
The variation in neuron-packing density with volume : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
The variation in neuron-packing density with volume : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
variance : It could also be that measuring specific neuronal subtypes would demonstrate a greater amount of variance than we currently report [32].
node_772
Abusaad and colleagues : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
Abusaad and colleagues : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
who : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
they : The variation in neuron-packing density with volume contrasts somewhat with the report of Abusaad and colleagues [36], who found no significant differences (P = .06) in neuronal packing density in the dentate gyrus cell layers of the hippocampus among the three mouse strains that they examined, but did see a significant difference in the pyramidal cell layers.
node_780
a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
These data : A recent report demonstrates a 25% range of granule cell packing density among 35 BXD recombinant inbred lines [41], a finding supporting the notion that packing density varies significantly among mouse strains.  These data suggest that principles that govern the relationship between neuronal volume and neuron-packing density may differ between the striatum and the other CNS regions.
node_804
the Mouse Brain Library : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
the Mouse Brain Library : Given the relatively small number of strains that we have sampled, our hypothesis of lower variation in striatal cell populations requires a more extensive test, a problem which we are now pursuing using the large numbers of strains in the Mouse Brain Library .
the Mouse Brain Library : This large RI set has already been processed and regenotyped and is now part of the Mouse Brain Library (see  and ).
the Mouse Brain Library : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
The MBL : The MBL is both a physical and Internet resource.
the Mouse Brain Library : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
node_811
77 cases total :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
77 cases total :  Verification of QTL Results  We have quantified the population of striatal neurons on both sides of the brain in 77 cases total.
This : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
this : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
node_816
gene mapping : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
gene mapping : This is a large sample from the perspective of stereological analysis of the mouse CNS, but from the perspective of gene mapping and quantitative genetics this is, of course, a modest-sized sample size and one that will need to be treated as a starting point for more refined genetic analysis.
mapping : These mapping data are concordant with our strain comparison and collectively suggest that there is apparently no significant genetic correlation between striatal volume and neuron number.
node_821
Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05 : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05 : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
one locus : Nonetheless, we have succeeded in mapping one locus, Bsc10a, which modulates striatal volume with a genome-wide significance of P < 0.05.
node_842
the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J : To confirm and refine our genetic dissection of the striatum we plan to analyze the AXB and BXA recombinant inbred (RI) strains generated by crossing A/J with C57BL/6J.
This large RI set : This large RI set has already been processed and regenotyped and is now part of the Mouse Brain Library (see  and ).
node_866
QTL mapping : A major goal of QTL mapping is to define loci that affect critical phenotypes with sufficient precision to generate short lists of candidate genes.
QTL mapping : A major goal of QTL mapping is to define loci that affect critical phenotypes with sufficient precision to generate short lists of candidate genes.
QTL Mapping : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
mapping : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
node_868
candidate genes : A major goal of QTL mapping is to define loci that affect critical phenotypes with sufficient precision to generate short lists of candidate genes.
candidate genes : A major goal of QTL mapping is to define loci that affect critical phenotypes with sufficient precision to generate short lists of candidate genes.
candidates for QTLs : Generating lists of candidates for QTLs will soon be greatly facilitated by more complete and better annotated mouse and human sequence databases combined with information on gene expression profiles of whole brain and striatum [42].
candidates : Once chromosomal positions of the QTLs have been determined to a precision of 1-3 cM, reducing the probability that a QTL actually represents a cluster of linked genes, it will become appropriate to assess strengths of candidates using transgenic animals and by sequence comparisons [43].  
node_871
QTLs : Generating lists of candidates for QTLs will soon be greatly facilitated by more complete and better annotated mouse and human sequence databases combined with information on gene expression profiles of whole brain and striatum [42].
QTLs : Generating lists of candidates for QTLs will soon be greatly facilitated by more complete and better annotated mouse and human sequence databases combined with information on gene expression profiles of whole brain and striatum [42].
the QTLs : Once chromosomal positions of the QTLs have been determined to a precision of 1-3 cM, reducing the probability that a QTL actually represents a cluster of linked genes, it will become appropriate to assess strengths of candidates using transgenic animals and by sequence comparisons [43].  
node_876
a QTL : Once chromosomal positions of the QTLs have been determined to a precision of 1-3 cM, reducing the probability that a QTL actually represents a cluster of linked genes, it will become appropriate to assess strengths of candidates using transgenic animals and by sequence comparisons [43].  
a QTL : Once chromosomal positions of the QTLs have been determined to a precision of 1-3 cM, reducing the probability that a QTL actually represents a cluster of linked genes, it will become appropriate to assess strengths of candidates using transgenic animals and by sequence comparisons [43].  
QTL : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
QTLs : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
node_880
Interval mapping : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
Interval mapping : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
mapping : F2 genotypes were entered into a spreadsheet program and transferred to Map Manager QTb28 for mapping and permutation analysis [67].
interval mapping : Map Manager implements both simple and composite interval mapping methods described by Haley and Knott [68].
node_885
genes known to affect brain development : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
genes known to affect brain development : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
these : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
node_888
brain development : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
brain development : Interval mapping places the QTL for Bsc10a in the central portion of Chr 10 in proximity with a number of genes known to affect brain development.
cerebral development : This molecule is important in cerebral development.
node_891
Grk2 : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
Grk2 : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
this receptor type : In the mouse, members of this receptor type act to indirectly down-regulate synaptic activity in the striatum [45].
node_892
Grk2 : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
Grk2 : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease : One of these is Grk2, a member of the family of ionotropic glutamate receptor genes that is thought to play a role in modulating Huntington disease [44].
node_902
Macs : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
Macs : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
This molecule : This molecule is important in cerebral development.
The MARCKS-related protein gene : The MARCKS-related protein gene is expressed in the striatum during early brain development in the rat [48].  
node_903
Macs : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
Macs : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
node_908
MARCKS protein : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
MARCKS protein : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate : Another gene that falls into the Bsc10a interval is Macs, the gene encoding the myristoylated alanine-rich C kinase substrate (MARCKS protein).
node_912
the corpus callosum : MARCKS-deficient mice have a high incidence of exencephaly, agenesis of the corpus callosum, and abnormalities other forebrain structure including widespread neocortical ectopias [46, 47].
the corpus callosum : MARCKS-deficient mice have a high incidence of exencephaly, agenesis of the corpus callosum, and abnormalities other forebrain structure including widespread neocortical ectopias [46, 47].
the corpus callosum : This molecule also has an important role in axon guidance: both the anterior portion of the corpus callosum and the optic chiasm are malformed or absent in Vax1 knockout mice [49].
node_917
the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
it : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
node_926
Vax1 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
Vax1 : The location of the QTL modulating striatal neuron number to the distal part of chromosome 19 places it in proximity to a number of genes that have been recently been shown to be important factors in telencephalic development, particularly Vax1.
Vax1 : Vax1 is a homeobox-containing gene and is a close relative of the Emx and Not genes.
Vax1 : Vax1 is localized during development to the anterior ventral forebrain, and is expressed in the striatum during embryogenesis [28].
This molecule : This molecule also has an important role in axon guidance: both the anterior portion of the corpus callosum and the optic chiasm are malformed or absent in Vax1 knockout mice [49].
Vax1 : In addition, Vax1 interacts with several molecules including sonic hedgehog,Pax2, Pax6, and Rx that are known to be important during development of the basal forebrain [27, 50].  
node_943
differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number : It has previously been shown that differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number [51, 52].
differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number : It has previously been shown that differences in brain weight are proportional to total brain DNA content and consequently to total CNS cell number [51, 52].
this reason : For this reason, brain weight has been suggested to be a good surrogate measure for total cell number in mice, as in humans [53].
node_953
previous work : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
previous work : Moreover, previous work has demonstrated a tight link between regional brain volume and neuron number [54, 55], which implies that volumetric measures reliably estimate neuron number.
this literature : With this literature in mind, we expected that our measures of striatal volume would predict neuron number in this nucleus.
node_966
With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
This result : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
node_973
A/J : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
A/J : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
strains with small striata : With the inbred strains, however, we found that strains with small striata (A/J) had virtually the same number of neurons as those with large striata (BALB/cJ).
node_979
This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits : This result indicates that at least for the striatum, volume is not a reliable indicator of neuron number, and that they may be two independent traits.
This conclusion : This conclusion is bolstered at the genetic level by our report of two distinct QTLs for these two morphologic phenotypes.
node_995
Subjects : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
Subjects : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
the 78 mice that we analyzed : Subjects  Thirty-four of the 78 mice that we analyzed were common inbred strains that were selected to sample a wide range of brain weights, and by expectation, striatal volumes.
the subjects used in the current experiment : This post-hoc test is functionally identical to a Fisher PLSD, but the alpha level is more conservative (.005).  Supplementary Material  StrAnatData.xls  This file contains anatomic data for each of the subjects used in the current experiment.  
node_1020
A/J : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
A/J : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
a strain with low brain weight : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_1024
BXD5 : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
BXD5 : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
a strain with high brain weight : To map QTLs that modulate variation in CNS size and cell populations we used an F2 intercross between a strain with low brain weight (A/J) and a strain with high brain weight (BXD5).
node_1029
a subset of 44 cases : A total of 518 of these ABDF2 progeny were generated, but for this study we selected a subset of 44 cases, of which 36 were fully genotyped (see below).
a subset of 44 cases : A total of 518 of these ABDF2 progeny were generated, but for this study we selected a subset of 44 cases, of which 36 were fully genotyped (see below).
which : A total of 518 of these ABDF2 progeny were generated, but for this study we selected a subset of 44 cases, of which 36 were fully genotyped (see below).
The sample : The sample included 20 animals in the lowest and highest quartiles, and 24 cases within 0.5 SD of the mean brain weight.
All brains analyzed in this study : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
brain : The head with brain was placed a vial with the last fixative and stored at 4°C until dissection.  Following dissection, the brains were weighed immediately.
the brains : The head with brain was placed a vial with the last fixative and stored at 4°C until dissection.  Following dissection, the brains were weighed immediately.
Brains : Brains were subsequently shipped to Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center.
They : They were immersed in fresh 10% formalin for at least one week before being embedding in celloidin [59].
Brains : Brains were cut on a sliding microtome at 30 μm in either horizontal or coronal planes.
the sample : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
the collection : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
node_1058
the Jackson Laboratory : All stocks of mice were obtained from the Jackson Laboratory .
the Jackson Laboratory : All stocks of mice were obtained from the Jackson Laboratory .
Jackson Laboratory : ABF2 mice were generated at the University of Tennessee by Dr. Richelle Strom [56] using Jackson Laboratory foundation stock.
node_1067
the Mouse Brain Library : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
the Mouse Brain Library : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
MBL : All brains analyzed in this study are part of the Mouse Brain Library (MBL).
node_1072
High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases : High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases are available at .
High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases : High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases are available at .
High-resolution : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
these images : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
Images from the sections : Images from the sections were captured at 12.5 x and were projected onto a video monitor.
node_1074
sections from all cases : High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases are available at .
sections from all cases : High-resolution digital images of sections from all cases are available at .
entire sections : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
the sections : Images from the sections were captured at 12.5 x and were projected onto a video monitor.
node_1077
double-strength fixative : An additional 10-ml of double-strength fixative (2.5% glutaraldehyde/2.0% paraformaldehyde) was injected for 1 to 2 min at an increased flow rate.
double-strength fixative : An additional 10-ml of double-strength fixative (2.5% glutaraldehyde/2.0% paraformaldehyde) was injected for 1 to 2 min at an increased flow rate.
the last fixative : The head with brain was placed a vial with the last fixative and stored at 4°C until dissection.  Following dissection, the brains were weighed immediately.
node_1090
histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample : Free-floating sections were stained with cresylechtviolett and four series of every tenth section were mounted on slides and coverslipped (see  for further details).  Histologic Phenotypes  Total Brain Volume  To accurately estimate histological shrinkage for each brain in the sample, we determined the volume of the entire brain and took a ratio of this value to the original fixed brain weight.
volumetric shrinkage : Subsequent measurements of striatal volume and neuron packing density were corrected for volumetric shrinkage.
node_1101
serial sections : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
serial sections : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
serial section : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
node_1103
point counting : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
point counting : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
point counting : High-resolution (4.5 μm/pixel) images of entire sections were taken from the Mouse Brain Library, and point counting was performed on these images using NIH Image 1.55  and an Apple Macintosh computer .
point counting : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
Point counting : Point counting was performed as above.
node_1105
Cavalieri's rule : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
Cavalieri's rule : Brain volumes were determined from serial sections using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
Cavalieri's rule : The average shrinkage was 62.2 ± 0.4% (a mean residual volume of 37.8%).  Striatal Volume  Volume of the striatum was also determined from serial section analysis using point counting and Cavalieri's rule.
node_1132
Neurons : Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number  Neurons were counted using the 3-dimensional counting software of Williams and Rakic [24].
Neurons : Striatal Neuron-Packing Density and Neuron Number  Neurons were counted using the 3-dimensional counting software of Williams and Rakic [24].
those neurons : A series of six contiguous counting boxes (each 40 x 65 x 20 μm) aligned in a 3 x 2 matrix were placed randomly within the striatum, and those neurons the nucleoli of which were in focus were counted as described previously [61, 62].
node_1147
Reliability : Reliability  
Reliability : Reliability  
test-retest reliability : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
reliability : The correlations among the three estimations ranged from .95 to .99 (P < .05), indicating a high degree of reliability for this dependent variable.
node_1151
an observer : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
an observer : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
The observer : The observer not only re-measured the striatal volume from the same series of sections as the original measure, but also estimated volume from a second series of 1 in 10 sections offset by 5 sections from the previous series.
node_1154
a subset of 10 brains from the collection : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
a subset of 10 brains from the collection : We determined test-retest reliability by having an observer blindly re-measure striatal volume on a subset of 10 brains from the collection.
the same 10 brains above :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
node_1158
the same series of sections as the original measure : The observer not only re-measured the striatal volume from the same series of sections as the original measure, but also estimated volume from a second series of 1 in 10 sections offset by 5 sections from the previous series.
the same series of sections as the original measure : The observer not only re-measured the striatal volume from the same series of sections as the original measure, but also estimated volume from a second series of 1 in 10 sections offset by 5 sections from the previous series.
the previous series : The observer not only re-measured the striatal volume from the same series of sections as the original measure, but also estimated volume from a second series of 1 in 10 sections offset by 5 sections from the previous series.
node_1165
reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers :  We assessed reliability of our estimates of neuronal numbers by having an observer blindly re-estimate neuron number in the same 10 brains above.
this measure : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
node_1175
Genotyping : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
Genotyping : The intra-observer correlation for this measure was .81 (P < .05), which is similar to the reliability seen in previous estimates of neuron number [39, 40].  Genotyping and QTL Mapping  Genomic DNA was extracted from spleens of F2 animals using a high-salt procedure [63].
genotyping : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
node_1180
A set of 82 microsatellite loci distributed across all autosomes and the X chromosome : A set of 82 microsatellite loci distributed across all autosomes and the X chromosome were typed in a set of ABDF2 animals using a standard PCR protocol [64, 65] as detailed in Zhou and Williams [66].
A set of 82 microsatellite loci distributed across all autosomes and the X chromosome : A set of 82 microsatellite loci distributed across all autosomes and the X chromosome were typed in a set of ABDF2 animals using a standard PCR protocol [64, 65] as detailed in Zhou and Williams [66].
the 82 markers used in the current experiment : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
node_1184
Map Manager : F2 genotypes were entered into a spreadsheet program and transferred to Map Manager QTb28 for mapping and permutation analysis [67].
Map Manager : F2 genotypes were entered into a spreadsheet program and transferred to Map Manager QTb28 for mapping and permutation analysis [67].
Map Manager : Map Manager implements both simple and composite interval mapping methods described by Haley and Knott [68].
MapManager : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
node_1189
likelihood ratio statistic : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
likelihood ratio statistic : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
LRS : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
node_1192
correctly ordered data sets : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
correctly ordered data sets : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
those same data sets : Two-tailed genome-wide significance levels were estimated by comparing the highest likelihood ratio statistic (LRS) of correctly ordered data sets with LRSs computed for 10,000 permutations of those same data sets [69].
node_1200
Regression Analysis of Trait Values : is associated with a 95% interval of 20 to 30 cM.  Regression Analysis of Trait Values  
Regression Analysis of Trait Values : is associated with a 95% interval of 20 to 30 cM.  Regression Analysis of Trait Values  
linear regression analysis : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
regression : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
node_1206
one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum : However, one of our goals in this study is to map QTLs with relatively intense effects on the striatum.
this reason : For this reason we also have corrected all of the parameters used in the mapping analysis for variation in brain weight using linear regression analysis.
node_1224
ANOVA statistical tests : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
ANOVA statistical tests : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
this analysis : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
the ANOVA : A Bonferroni/Dunn correction was used for post hoc examination of significant main effects in the ANOVA.
node_1226
StrAnatData.xls : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
StrAnatData.xls : The corrected values are referred to as residuals.  Analysis  All data were analyzed using regression, correlation, and ANOVA statistical tests (see StrAnatData.xls for original data used to perform this analysis).
StrAnatData.xls : This post-hoc test is functionally identical to a Fisher PLSD, but the alpha level is more conservative (.005).  Supplementary Material  StrAnatData.xls  This file contains anatomic data for each of the subjects used in the current experiment.  
This file : This post-hoc test is functionally identical to a Fisher PLSD, but the alpha level is more conservative (.005).  Supplementary Material  StrAnatData.xls  This file contains anatomic data for each of the subjects used in the current experiment.  
StrAnatData.xls : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
node_1229
A Bonferroni/Dunn correction : A Bonferroni/Dunn correction was used for post hoc examination of significant main effects in the ANOVA.
A Bonferroni/Dunn correction : A Bonferroni/Dunn correction was used for post hoc examination of significant main effects in the ANOVA.
This post-hoc test : This post-hoc test is functionally identical to a Fisher PLSD, but the alpha level is more conservative (.005).  Supplementary Material  StrAnatData.xls  This file contains anatomic data for each of the subjects used in the current experiment.  
node_1238
StrMap.qtx : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
StrMap.qtx : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
This file : Click here to download StrAnatData.xls  StrMap.qtx  This file contains the genotyping data from the 82 markers used in the current experiment, in MapManager QTX format.  
StrMap.qtx : Click here to download StrMap.qtx
